Oklahoma, session 2026, SB843.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-113, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5-113. A. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, no person shall be eligible to be a candidate for or serve
on a board of education if the person is currently employed by the
school district governed by that board of education or is related
within the second degree by affinity or consanguinity to any other
member of the board of education or to any employee of the school
district governed by the board of education. The purpose of this
section is both to prohibit persons who are related within the
second degree by affinity or consanguinity from serving
simultaneously on the same board of education of any school district
of this state and to prohibit persons who are related within the
second degree of consanguinity or affinity to an employee of a

school district from serving on the board of education governing the
school district while such relative is employed except as otherwise
provided in this section.
B. If the relationship is based on affinity, the prohibitions
in this section shall not apply to prevent members of boards of
education who are serving on September 1, 1995, from serving the
term for which they were elected or from serving successive terms
for which they may be elected, unless it is the member’s spouse who
is a member of the board of education or an employee of the school
district,; then such prohibitions shall apply.
C. The prohibitions set forth in this section shall not apply
if:
1. The person related to the board member within the second
degree of affinity or consanguinity is employed as a substitute
teacher by the school district pursuant to the provisions of Section
6-105 of this title or as a temporary substitute support employee if
the school district has an Average Daily Membership average daily
membership (ADM) of less than five thousand (5,000); or
2. The school district has an ADM of less than four hundred
(400) five hundred fifty (550), the board of education has adopted a
policy providing for such candidate eligibility and the board member
who is related within the second degree by affinity or consanguinity
to any employee of the school district governed by the board of
education complies with the provisions of subsection E of Section 5-
113.1 of this title.
D. Any member of a board of education who violates the
provisions of this section shall be subject to the penalties
prescribed by Sections 485 and 486 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 5-113.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 5-113.1. A. Except as otherwise provided in this
section, no person may be employed or put under contract by a school
district if that person is related to a member of the board of
education of that school district within the second degree of
ENR. S. B. NO. 843 Page 2

consanguinity or affinity. A teacher or employee already under
contract to or otherwise employed by the school district at the time
the relationship is established may continue in said such
employment. Except as otherwise provided, a board member already
serving at the time the relationship is established may serve out
the term for which the member was elected but shall not be eligible
to be a candidate for or serve successive terms of office for which
the member may be elected.
B. The provisions of this section shall not prevent a board
member from serving successive terms of office if otherwise eligible
under the provision of Section 5-113 of this title. No member of
the board of education who has resigned from the board before the
term of the person has expired may be reappointed to the board to
complete the remainder of the term if a teacher or employee related
to the resigned member of the board within the second degree of
consanguinity or affinity was put under contract or otherwise
employed by the school district after the board member resigned.
C. The provisions of this section shall not prevent a person
who is related to a member of the board of education within the
second degree of consanguinity or affinity from being employed by
the school district as a substitute teacher pursuant to the
provisions of Section 6-105 of this title or as a temporary
substitute support employee if the school district has an Average
Daily Membership average daily membership (ADM) of less than five
thousand (5,000).
D. The provisions of this section shall not prevent a person
who is related to a member of the board of education within the
second degree of consanguinity or affinity from being employed by
the school district if the school district has an Average Daily
Membership average daily membership (ADM) of less than four hundred
(400) five hundred fifty (550) and the board of education has
adopted a policy providing for such employment.
E. Any member of a board of education who is related to a
teacher or other employee of the district within the second degree
of consanguinity or affinity shall not attend or participate in any
regular or executive session of the board held to consider any
personnel matter or litigation relating to said such teacher or
employee. The member may vote on collective bargaining agreements
ENR. S. B. NO. 843 Page 3

or the renewal of contracts as a group if the vote is necessary to
form a quorum of the board of education members. If more than one
member of the board of education is related to a teacher or
employee, only the minimum number of those members which is
necessary to form a quorum shall be allowed to vote. Each board of
education so affected shall adopt a written policy establishing
procedures on when such a member may vote on the renewal of
contracts or collective bargaining agreements.
F. Any member of a board of education who violates the
provisions of this section shall be subject to the penalties
prescribed by Sections 485 and 486 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 843 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 843 Page 5